Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Operation and Powers

7-60-201. Powers granted to counties.

In furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, which are hereby determined to be county purposes for which county funds may be expended, each county shall, in addition to those powers otherwise conferred by any general statute, special act, charter or ordinance, have the following powers, except as otherwise limited by this chapter, and provided the exercise of such powers by a county shall be in accordance with the procedures established by this chapter:

Acquire, and contract and enter into advance commitments to acquire, by assignment or otherwise, home mortgages owned by lending institutions or participations or other interests in home mortgages at such purchase prices and upon such other terms and conditions as shall be determined by the county or other person as it may designate as its agent, make and execute contracts with lending institutions for the origination and servicing of home mortgages and pay the reasonable value of services rendered under those contracts; provided, that such home mortgages shall be originated and serviced by lending institutions. In the administration of this program, the county shall ensure the reasonable opportunity of equal participation to every lending institution situated within the county as mortgage originators and servicers regardless of the size of such institution or of its share of any market area. Such commitments and contracts, together with all necessary forms, shall be made with and available to any and all lending institutions desiring to make such home mortgages available to persons and families of lower and moderate income. Each county shall include in its contracts and commitments any lending institution situated within the county owned or controlled by minority groups if such lending institution elects to participate in such program;

Make loans to lending institutions under terms and conditions that, in addition to other provisions as determined by the county, shall require the lending institutions to use substantially all of the net proceeds of the loans, directly or indirectly, for the making of home mortgages in an aggregate principal amount substantially equal to the amount of such net proceeds; provided, that each county shall make available loans to any lending institution situated within the county owned or controlled by minority groups;

Borrow money and issue its negotiable bonds and notes, and fund or refund the same, to defray, in whole or in part, the costs of purchasing or funding the making of home mortgages, including, but not limited to, the costs of studies and surveys, insurance premiums, underwriting fees and legal, accounting and financial advisory fees incurred in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds and notes, including reserve funds and accounts and trustee, custodian and rating agency fees, interest on the bonds and notes for a period not exceeding two (2) years from their date, and designate appropriate names for such bonds and notes, and provide for the rights of the holders of the bonds and notes;

Sell or otherwise dispose of or enter into commitments for the sale or other disposal of any home mortgages, in whole or in part, or loan sufficient funds to defray, in whole or in part, the costs of purchasing home mortgages or participations in home mortgages, so that the revenues to be derived with respect to the home mortgages, together with any insurance proceeds, reserve funds and accounts and earnings on reserve funds and accounts, shall be designated to produce revenues and receipts at least sufficient to provide for the prompt payment at maturity of principal, interest and redemption premiums, if any, upon all bonds and notes issued to finance such costs;

Make qualified home improvement loans to persons or families who meet the criteria established under this chapter and who agree to abide by the proper rules and regulations promulgated for the administration of the loan program; and enter into any contract, with any person or institution, reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter;

Pledge home mortgages, notes or other property and any revenues and receipts to be received from home mortgages, notes or other property to the punctual payment of bonds and notes as issued under this chapter and the interest and redemption premiums, if any, on the bonds and notes;

Make and publish rules and regulations respecting its financial assistance programs and such other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to:

The time within which lending institutions must make commitments and disbursements for home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans;

The location and other characteristics of homes to be financed by home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans;

The terms and conditions of home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans to be acquired;

The amounts and types of insurance coverage required on homes, home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans and bonds;

The representations and warranties of lending institutions confirming compliance with such standards and requirements;

Restrictions as to interest rates and other terms of home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans or the return realized from the mortgages or loans by lending institutions;

The type and amount of collateral security to be provided to assure repayment of any loans from the county and to assure repayment of bonds;

The classes of persons who may be eligible for mortgages or qualified home improvement loans under such program;

The maximum purchase price of homes for which mortgages or qualified home improvement loans may be originated under such program; and

Any other matters related to the purchase of home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans or the making of loans to lending institutions as shall be deemed relevant by the county;

Following the date of issuance of any bonds or notes under this chapter, there shall be reserved from the lendable proceeds of the bonds or notes, for persons and families in targeted area, as defined in the federal law, not less than the percentage of such proceeds required by the federal law for not less than the period required by the federal law;

Establish and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing and servicing any of its loans, notes, commitments and other evidences of indebtedness;

Employ financial advisors, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the county and fix and pay their reasonable compensation and expenses from moneys available to such county for their employment;

Make, enter into and enforce all contracts, including contracts for the servicing of mortgages or qualified home improvement loans necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the county or to the performance of its powers under this chapter, including contracts with any person, firm, agency, governmental agency or other entity, and all Tennessee governmental agencies are hereby authorized to enter into contracts, and otherwise cooperate with a county to facilitate the purposes of the chapter;

Accept gifts, grants or loans of funds, property or services from any source, public or private, and comply, subject to this chapter and to any agreements with bondholders and noteholders, with the terms and conditions of the acceptance;

Sue and be sued and plead and be impleaded with respect to any action taken pursuant to powers granted by this chapter; and

To the extent required by the federal law, pay or credit arbitrage and investment gains to the mortgagors, to the United States or to such other party or parties as may be designated by the federal law.

Bonds shall not be issued under the powers granted in this chapter, unless such bonds are rated “A” or higher by one (1) of the two (2) major nationally recognized rating agencies, or unless such bonds are sold in a transaction not involving any public offering within the meaning of § 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77d), and the rules and regulations promulgated under the Securities Act.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4404; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 11-17.

Cross-References. Homebuyers' revolving loan fund pool, title 13, ch. 23, part 3.

Purposes of loans, §7-60-102.

7-60-202. Prerequisites to exercising powers.

No power granted to a county under this chapter may be exercised unless and until the county shall have found and determined by resolution that conditions substantially as described in § 7-60-102 exist in the county, are continuing and may be ameliorated by the exercise of the powers granted under this chapter.

Such resolution shall include the following findings:

Persons and families of lower and moderate income in the county are subject to hardship in finding and financing through private banking channels decent, safe and sanitary housing;

Private enterprise is not adequately meeting the need for providing and financing decent, safe and sanitary housing for such persons and families and the reduction of blight and deterioration;

There exist in the county conditions of blight and the deterioration of the quality of the environment and living conditions in the county;

Conditions of unemployment and underemployment exist in the construction industry in the county; and

The conditions of unemployment and underemployment and the need for decent, safe and sanitary housing shall be diminished and the blight and the deterioration of the quality of the environment and living conditions in the county shall be alleviated by the exercise and full implementation of the powers granted under this chapter.

The resolution shall not pass final consideration until after a public hearing on the preliminary findings and determinations on the conditions in such county.

Not less than thirty (30) days prior to such public hearing, a notice of public hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

Such notice shall include the preliminary findings and determinations on which such resolution was adopted.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4405; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 18, 19.

Cross-References. Purposes of loans, §7-60-102.

7-60-203. Issuance of bonds and notes.

Notwithstanding any general statute, special act, charter or ordinance to the contrary, a county has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time its bonds and notes in such principal amounts as the county shall determine to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving the purposes of this chapter.

A county has the power, from time to time, to issue:

Notes to renew notes; and

Bonds to pay notes, including the interest on the notes and, whenever the county deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding for any of the purposes of this chapter. The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded or sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of such bonds.

The bonds and notes shall be authorized by resolution of the county, shall bear such date or dates and shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of the bonds or notes as such resolution may provide. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or as a combination of serial bonds and term bonds. The bonds and notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either bearer or registered, carry such exchange, transfer and registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, as such resolution may provide. Such bonds and notes may be sold by the county at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the governing body of the county shall determine.

Any resolution authorizing bonds or notes or any issue of bonds or notes may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract or contracts with the holders of the bonds or notes:

To pledge all or any part of the revenues or receipts derived by the county from the home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans to the punctual payment of bonds or notes issued for such home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans and interest on the mortgages and loans, and covenant against thereafter pledging any such revenues or receipts to any other bonds or notes of the county for any other purpose, except as otherwise provided in the resolution for the issuance of additional bonds or notes to be equally and ratably secured by a lien upon such revenues and receipts;

To covenant as to limitations on the use and purposes and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of such bonds or notes and the pledging of such proceeds to secure the bonds or notes or of any issue of the bonds or notes;

To covenant as to the rates or charges fixed in connection with the home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans for which such bonds or notes are to be issued and as to the use and disposition to be made of the mortgages or loans, including the maximum interest rate payable on any home mortgage;

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or notes;

To provide limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes; the terms upon which additional bonds or notes may be issued and secured; and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent to the amendment or abrogation, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of moneys to be expended by the county for its operating expenses with respect to home mortgage loans;

Vesting in a trustee or trustees property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the county may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders or noteholders pursuant to this chapter, and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders or noteholders to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee;

To covenant to set aside or pay over reserves and sinking funds for such bonds or notes and as to the regulation and disposition of the reserves and sinking funds;

To redeem such bonds or notes, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions of redemption;

To covenant and prescribe as to what happenings or occurrences shall constitute “events of default” as to such bonds or notes and to provide for the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds or notes in the event of such default, including the right to appointment of a receiver; provided, that such rights and remedies are not inconsistent with the general laws of the state and the other provisions of this chapter;

To covenant as to the terms and conditions upon which any or all of such bonds or notes shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, conditions or obligation;

To vest in a trustee or trustees the right to receive all or any part of the revenues and receipts pledged and assigned to, or for the benefit of, the holder or holders of bonds or notes issued under this chapter, and to hold, apply and dispose of the revenues and receipts, including the investment of the revenues and receipts, and the right to enforce any covenant made to secure or pay in relation to the bonds or notes; to execute and deliver a trust agreement or trust agreements that may set forth the powers and duties and the remedies available to such trustee or trustees, and limiting the liabilities of the trustee or trustees, and describing what happenings or occurrences shall constitute events of default, and prescribing the terms and conditions upon which such trustee or trustees or the holder or holders of bonds or notes of any specified amount or percentage of such bonds or notes may exercise such rights and enforce any and all such covenants and resort to such remedies as may be appropriate;

To execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this chapter, or in the performance of its covenants and duties; and

To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to protect and secure such bonds or notes and the holders of the bonds or notes, or in the discretion of the governing body of the county, tend to make such bonds or notes more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this chapter, it being the purpose of this chapter to give each county power to do all things in the issuance of the bonds or notes and for their security that may be consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee.

Any pledge made by the county shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, and the revenues or property so pledged and thereafter received by the county shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery of the revenues or property or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the county, without regard to whether such parties have notice of the lien. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

No bonds shall be issued pursuant to this chapter until after a public hearing on the issuance of such bonds. Not less than thirty (30) days prior to such public hearing, a notice of public hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

Any county issuing bonds or notes under this chapter and any official of the county is empowered to take such action as may be necessary from time to time to preserve the exemption from federal income taxation of the interest on such bonds or notes.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4406; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 20-24, 31.

7-60-204. Procedure for adoption of resolutions.

All action required or authorized to be taken under this chapter by the governing body of any county may be by resolution, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting, regular or special, of the governing body at which such resolution is introduced, and shall take effect immediately upon such adoption. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no resolution under this chapter need be published or posted, nor shall any such resolution be subject to veto by the chief executive officer of a county or presiding officer of the governing body. Any such resolution shall require for its passage not less than a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body present at the meeting, regular or special, in which such resolution shall be introduced for passage.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4407; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

7-60-205. Recital of issuance pursuant to chapter.

Any resolution authorizing bonds or notes under this chapter may provide that such bonds or notes shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4408.

7-60-206. Interim certificates — Temporary obligations.

Pending the preparation or delivery of the definitive bonds or notes, interim certificates or other temporary obligations may be issued by a county to the purchaser of the bonds or notes. Such interim certificates or other temporary obligations shall be in such form and contain such terms, conditions and provisions as the governing body of such county issuing the interim certificates or other temporary obligations may determine.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4409; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

7-60-207. Validity of bonds or notes.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of the bonds or notes authorized under this chapter shall not be dependent on or affected in any way by proceedings relating to home mortgages or qualified home improvement loans for which the bonds or notes are issued. Bonds or notes issued under this chapter bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds or notes shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds or notes any or all of the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds or notes have ceased to be officers of the county issuing the bonds or notes.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4410; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 25, 26.

7-60-208. Deposit and payment of funds — Security — Accounting — Audit.

All moneys of a county derived in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, except as otherwise authorized or provided in this chapter, shall be deposited as soon as practicable in a separate account or accounts in banks or trust companies doing business in or out of the state.

The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on checks signed by such officer or employee of the county as the county shall authorize.

All deposits of such moneys shall, if required by the county, be secured by obligations of the United States or of the state or of the county of a market value equal at all times to the amount of the deposit, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

Notwithstanding this section, a county shall have power to contract with the holders of any of its bonds or notes as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any moneys of the county derived in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, and of any moneys held in a trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes, and to carry out such contract.

Moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes or in any way to secure bonds or notes and deposits of such moneys may be secured in the same manner as moneys of the county, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

Subject to any contract with bondholders and noteholders, a county issuing bonds or notes pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe a system of accounts. All such accounts shall be kept separate from other accounts of the county and shall be used for the purposes of this chapter and for no other purpose.

All accounts of a county established in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter shall be annually audited by the comptroller of the treasury, an independent public accountant or independent certified public accountant, selected by the county and approved by the comptroller of the treasury, and a report of such audit and the books and records of the county kept with respect to any action taken or account established under this chapter, including books and records pertaining to its receipts, disbursements, contracts, reserve funds, sinking funds and investments, shall be open to public inspection.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4411; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 25, 27.

7-60-209. Liability for bonds or notes.

All bonds and notes issued under this chapter shall be limited obligations of the county issuing the bonds or notes payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the home mortgages or from any notes or other obligations of lending institutions with respect to which such bonds or notes are issued.

No holder of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter shall have the right to compel any exercise of taxing power of a county to pay the bonds or notes, the interest or redemption premium, if any, on the bonds or notes, and the bonds or notes shall not constitute an indebtedness of any county or a loan of credit of the county within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provisions, nor shall the bonds or notes be construed to create any moral obligation on the part of any county, the state, or any political subdivision of the county or state, with respect to the payment of such bonds or notes.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond or note that it has been issued under this chapter and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the county issuing the bonds or notes or a loan of credit of the county within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4412; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

7-60-210. Bonds and notes made securities.

The bonds and notes of counties are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all counties, municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or in other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.

The bonds and notes are also hereby made securities, which may be deposited with and may be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all counties and municipalities for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4413; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 28.

7-60-211. Exemption from taxation.

It is hereby determined that the powers conferred upon counties by this chapter are in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state and for the improvement of their health, safety, welfare, comfort and security, and that the purposes of this chapter are public purposes and that counties are performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon them by this chapter. The state covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of bonds and notes issued by a county pursuant to this chapter, in consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the bonds and notes, that any such bonds and notes of the county and the income from the bonds and notes shall at all times be free from taxation, except for inheritance, transfer and estate taxes. Counties are authorized to include this covenant of the state in any agreement with the holder of such bonds or notes.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4414; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

Cross-References. Tax exemption for participating county, §7-60-215.

7-60-212. Agreement with bond and noteholders.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested by this chapter in a county to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of the bonds or notes, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such bonds and notes, together with the interest on the bonds and notes, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged. A county is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of bonds or notes.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4415; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

7-60-213. Filings with state funding board.

Any county issuing bonds under authority of this chapter shall file with the state funding board such information concerning any issue as the funding board may request.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4416; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

7-60-214. Exemption from bidding or restrictive requirements, and from antitrust laws.

Any requirement of competitive bidding or restriction imposed on the procedure for award of contracts for the sale or other disposition of public property is not applicable to any action taken under authority of this chapter.

The transactions undertaken pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to any antitrust law now or hereafter in effect in this state.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4417.

7-60-215. Tax exemption for participating county.

All home mortgages and notes or other obligations of lending institutions executed pursuant to this chapter and held by or on behalf of the county and the revenues and receipts derived by such county from the mortgages, notes and other obligations shall be exempt from all taxation in this state. The exemption contained in this section shall not be construed as an exemption from the payment of any mortgage recording or registration fees otherwise required by law.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4418; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 25.

Cross-References. Exemption from taxation, §7-60-211.

7-60-216. Energy conservation.

When loans are made for the purchase of new houses, such preference in making loans as may be determined by the governing body of the county shall go to those houses incorporating energy-conserving design, construction or other energy-saving features, including solar heating or solar water heating. With houses incorporating such design, construction, or features, the amount of permissible loan may be increased to cover any extra cost such elements represent over the cost of a similar house without such elements.

When loans are made for the purchase of older houses, such preference in making loans as may be determined by the governing body of the county shall go to those houses incorporating energy-conserving design, construction, or other energy-saving features, including solar heating or solar water heating. With houses incorporating such design, construction, or features, the amount of permissible loan may be increased to cover any extra costs such elements represent over the cost of a similar house without such elements.

A reasonable percentage of new houses financed through this chapter shall be equipped with solar water heating units to supply all or substantially all of the heated water requirement of that household, the determination of the governing body of the county with respect to the reasonableness of such percentage to be conclusive. The applicable amount of mortgage money available to a person through this chapter shall be increased by an amount necessary to cover any added costs of such heater. Each county acting under this chapter shall determine the percentage of houses to be so equipped.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4419; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 29.

7-60-217. Interlocal cooperation.

The governing bodies of any two (2) or more counties, whether or not contiguous, are empowered to enter into such agreements, contractual arrangements or compacts as they may deem necessary and desirable in order to provide for the joint conducting or financing of any of the functions or the services authorized by this chapter, including the joint issuance of bonds or notes by any two (2) or more such counties, and including the issuance of bonds or notes by any one (1) or more such counties and the allocation of the proceeds of the bonds or notes to one (1) or more other counties, and in conjunction with the joint issuance of bonds or notes, to exercise all the powers granted by § 5-1-114.

In the event of the issuance of bonds or notes by any county and the allocation of a portion of the proceeds of the bonds or notes to any other county, the issuance of such bonds or notes shall be approved in general terms by the governing body of such other county, including the approval of the maximum interest rate and the maximum term of such bonds or notes.

In the event of the joint issuance of bonds or notes, the proceeds of the bonds or notes, after the payment of all expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds or notes, including particularly those costs and expenses enumerated in § 7-60-201(a)(3), may be allocated to each of the counties jointly issuing such bonds or notes in the manner that such counties may agree upon, but in no event shall the share of such bond or note proceeds allocated to any county, together with the proceeds of any other bonds or notes issued under this chapter and allocated to such county, exceed in any year that proportion, including such proportion as may have resulted from the agreement of counties, of the state ceiling for such year to which that county is entitled pursuant to § 7-60-102(f).

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4421; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 30.

Cross-References. Interlocal cooperation generally, title 12, ch. 9.